Tennessee, session 114, HB1356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-3-312(g), is amended by deleting
the language "within forty-five (45) days of receipt" and substituting "within sixty (60) days of
receipt".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1356
003335
- 1 -